test/src/morphology/V-munzjasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - мунзясь: # Verb 'to be silent' /Type 6a/ - partial paradigm
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мунзидмʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мунзин
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мунзи
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: мунзиниʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мунзидиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мунзихиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мунзиваˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мунзидаˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунзиˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: мунзидамзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: мунзинась
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мунзись
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: мунзининзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: мунзидинзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: мунзихинзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: мунзиваць
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: мунзидаць
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунзиць
     
     мунзясь+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: мунзьхадмʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: мунзюˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: мунзяя
     мунзясь+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: мунзьханиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: мунзидиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: мунзяяхаʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: мунзьхаваˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: мунзидаˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: мунзяяˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: мунзьидмʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: мунзьин
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: мунзьи
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: мунзьиниʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: мунзьидиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: мунзьихиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: мунзьиваˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: мунзьидаˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: мунзьиˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: мунзьидамзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: мунзьинась
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: мунзьись
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: мунзьининзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: мунзьидинзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: мунзьихинзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: мунзьиваць
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: мунзьидаць
     мунзясь+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: мунзьиць  
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: мунзьбцудмʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: мунзьбцун
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: мунзьбцу
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: мунзьбцуниʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: мунзьбцудиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: мунзьбцухуʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: мунзьбцуваˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: мунзьбцудаˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: мунзьбцуˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: мунзьсадмʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: мунзьсан
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: мунзьса
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: мунзьсаниʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: мунзьсадиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: мунзьсахаʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: мунзьсаваˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: мунзьсадаˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: мунзьсаˮ     
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: мунзьвэдмʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: мунзьвэн
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: мунзьвы
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: мунзьвэниʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: мунзьвэдиʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: мунзьвэхэʼ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: мунзьвэваˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: мунзьвэдаˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: мунзьвыˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: мунзьвэдамзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: мунзьвэнась
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [мунзьвысь, мунзьвэсь]
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: мунзьвэнинзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: мунзьвэдинзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: мунзьвэхэнзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: мунзьвэваць
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: мунзьвэдаць
     мунзясь+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [мунзьвыць, мунзьвэць]
    
     мунзясь+V+IV+InfImprf: мунзьва
     мунзясь+V+IV+InfPrf: мунзьˮма
     мунзясь+V+IV+PrcImprf: мунзьда
     мунзясь+V+IV+PrcPrf: мунзьвы
     мунзясь+V+IV+PrcFut: [мунзявнда, мунзювнда]
     мунзясь+V+IV+PrcNeg: [мунзявдавэй, мунзювдавэй]
     мунзясь+V+IV+Ger: [мунзя, мунзясь]
     мунзясь+V+IV+GerFin: мунзьванзь
     мунзясь+V+IV+ConNeg: мунзюˮ
     мунзясь+V+IV+Subord+Abs: мунзябˮ     
     мунзясь+V+IV+Fut+Subord+Abs: мунзьӈгобˮ   
     мунзясь+V+IV+Evas+Abs: мунзьвоӈгад  
     мунзясь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: мунзьӈгуˮ   
